Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.310

Boundary line adjustment—Agreement—Not subject to review.

(1) This section provides a method to adjust the boundary lines between two cities where the two cities share a common boundary within a right-of-way of a public street, road, or highway, or the two cities have a portion of their boundaries separated only by all or part of the right-of-way of a public street, road, or highway. However, this section does not apply to situations where a boundary line runs from one edge of the right-of-way to the other edge of the right-of-way.

(2) The councils of any two cities in a situation described in subsection (1) of this section may enter into an agreement to alter those portions of their boundaries that are necessary to eliminate this situation and create a partial common boundary on either edge of the right-of-way of the public street, road, or highway. An agreement made under this section shall include only boundary line adjustments between the two cities that are necessary to eliminate the situation described in subsection (1) of this section.

A boundary line adjustment under this section is not subject to potential review by a boundary review board.

[ 1989 c 84 s 13.]